Illinois, session 104th, HB5090.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-15.15 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/1-15.15)7    Sec. 1-15.15. Chief Procurement Officer. "Chief 8Procurement Officer" means any of the 4 persons appointed or 9approved by a majority of the members of the Executive Ethics 10Commission:11        (1) for procurements for (i) construction and 12    construction-related services committed by law to the 13    jurisdiction or responsibility of the Capital Development 14    Board or (ii) construction and construction-related 15    services committed by law to the jurisdiction or 16    responsibility of the Department of Central Management 17    Services under Section 405-217 of the Department of 18    Central Management Services Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois and other related 20    provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21    Assembly, the independent chief procurement officer 22    appointed by a majority of the members of the Executive 23    Ethics Commission.  HB5090 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20486 HLH 33958 b1        (2) for procurements for all construction, 2    construction-related services, operation of any facility, 3    and the provision of any construction or 4    construction-related service or activity committed by law 5    to the jurisdiction or responsibility of the Illinois 6    Department of Transportation, including the direct or 7    reimbursable expenditure of all federal funds for which 8    the Department of Transportation is responsible or 9    accountable for the use thereof in accordance with federal 10    law, regulation, or procedure, the independent chief 11    procurement officer appointed by the Secretary of 12    Transportation with the consent of the majority of the 13    members of the Executive Ethics Commission.14        (3) for all procurements made by a public institution 15    of higher education, the independent chief procurement 16    officer appointed by a majority of the members of the 17    Executive Ethics Commission.18        (4) (Blank). 19        (5) for all other procurements, the independent chief 20    procurement officer appointed by a majority of the members 21    of the Executive Ethics Commission.22(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.